Vermont, session 2025-2026, S247.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6621 is added to read:
§ 6621. USE OF CHEMICAL CONVERSION TECHNOLOGIES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Chemical conversion technologies” means using plastic inputs:
(A) as a fuel or fuel substitute or the general use of plastic in energy
production; or
(B) in the use of the following processes:
(i) gasification;
(ii) pyrolysis;
(iii) solvolysis;
(iv) hydropyrolysis;
(v) methanolysis;
(vi) glycolysis;
(vii) enzymatic breakdown;
(viii) solvent-based purification;
(ix) combustion; or
(x) any other process used to transform plastic or plastic-derived
materials into plastic monomers, waxes, lubricants, chemical feedstocks, crude
oil, diesel, gasoline, or home heating oil.
VT LEG #385740 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.247
2026 Page 3 of 8
(2) “Facility” is a facility, as that term is defined in section 6602 of this
chapter, operated for the purpose of performing, facilitating, aiding, or
otherwise engaging in chemical conversion.
(3) “Plastic” means a synthetic material made from linking monomers
through a chemical reaction to create a polymer chain that can be molded or
extruded at high heat into various solid forms that retain their defined shapes
during their life cycle and after disposal, including material derived from either
petroleum or a biologically based polymer, such as corn or other plant sources.
(4) “Recycling” means any process in which materials are collected,
separated, or processed and returned to the marketplace in the form of raw
materials to make new products. “Recycling” does not include chemical
conversion.
(b) A person shall not use or operate chemical conversion technologies in
the State.
(c)(1) A person shall not build, construct, establish, or operate any facility
in the State that uses chemical conversion technologies.
(2) The prohibition in this subsection applies to the modification or
conversion of any existing certified solid waste facility in the State into a
facility that uses a chemical conversion technology.
(d) The State of Vermont shall not provide subsidies, grants, tax breaks, or
any other financial or nonfinancial incentives to support the development of
VT LEG #385740 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.247
2026 Page 4 of 8
facilities that use chemical conversion technologies or programs focused on
chemical conversion technologies.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. §§ 1514 and 1515 are added to read:
§ 1514. MEDICAL DEVICES; DEHP
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “DEHP” means di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate.
(2) “Intentionally added DEHP” means DEHP that a manufacturer has
intentionally added to an intravenous or other specified medical solution
container or medical tubing product and that has a functional or technical
effect on the product.
(3) “Medical solution container” means a container used to house
medicine, fluid, or nutrition therapy that is administered intravenously or
through the mouth, nose, stomach, or intestines to patients in a hospital,
outpatient, or other health care facility.
(4) “Medical tubing” means any tubing used to administer fluids,
medication, nutrients, or oxygen, including:
(A) intravenous tubing used to administer fluids, medication, or
parenteral nutrition directly into the bloodstream of an adult, child, or infant;
(B) medical tubing used to deliver enteral nutrition or medication to
the digestive system for an adult, child, or infant; or
VT LEG #385740 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.247
2026 Page 5 of 8
(C) respiratory tubing and nasal cannulas delivering oxygen to an
infant or child.
(5) “Ortho-phthalates” means a class of chemicals that are esters of
ortho-phthalic acid.
(6) “Unintentionally added DEHP” means DEHP in an intravenous or
specified medical solution container or medical tubing product that is not used
for a functional or technical effect on the product.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2030, no person shall manufacture, sell, or
distribute in commerce in Vermont a medical solution container made with
intentionally added DEHP.
(c) Beginning on January 1, 2035, no person shall manufacture, sell, or
distribute in commerce in Vermont medical tubing made with intentionally
added DEHP.
(d) No person shall replace DEHP prohibited in a product under this
section with other ortho-phthalates.
(e) A medical solution container or medical tubing product shall not have
unintentionally added DEHP present in a quantity at or above 0.1 percent by
weight.
VT LEG #385740 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.247
2026 Page 6 of 8
(f) The following are exempt from the requirements of this section:
(1) human blood collection and storage bags; and
(2) apheresis and cell therapy blood kits and bags, including integral
tubing.
§ 1515. DESIGNATED CLEANING PRODUCTS; PERSONAL CARE
PRODUCTS; MICROBEAD PROHIBITION
(a) As used in this section
(1) “Air care product” means a chemically formulated consumer product
labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to enhance or condition
the indoor environment by eliminating unpleasant odors or freshening the air.
(2) “Automotive product” means a chemically formulated consumer
product labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to maintain the
appearance of a motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4,
including products for washing, waxing, polishing, cleaning, or treating the
exterior or interior surfaces of motor vehicles. “Automotive product” does not
mean automotive paint or paint repair products.
(3) “Chemically formulated consumer product” means a product,
excluding home appliances, that is manufactured from chemicals to be used by
household, institutional, or commercial consumers without further processing
for specific purposes. For the purposes of this subdivision, dilution by the user
is not considered further processing.
VT LEG #385740 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.247
2026 Page 7 of 8
(4) “Designated cleaning product” means a finished product that is an
air care product, automotive product, general cleaning product, or a polish or
floor maintenance product used primarily for janitorial, domestic, or
institutional cleaning purposes. “Designated cleaning product” does not mean
any of the following:
(A) food, drugs, or cosmetics, including personal care products; or
(B) industrial products specifically manufactured for, and exclusively
used in, the following:
(i) oil and gas production;
(ii) steel production;
(iii) heavy industry manufacturing;
(iv) industrial water treatment;
(v) industrial textile maintenance and processing other than
industrial laundering;
(vi) food and beverage processing and packaging; or
(vii) other industrial manufacturing processes.
(5) “General cleaning product” means a soap, detergent, or other
chemically formulated consumer product labeled to indicate that the purpose of
the product is to clean, disinfect, or otherwise care for fabric, dishes, or other
wares; surfaces, including floors, furniture, countertops, showers, and baths; or
other hard surfaces, such as stovetops, microwaves, and other appliances.
VT LEG #385740 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.247
2026 Page 8 of 8
(6) “Personal care product” means an article intended to be rubbed,
poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on; introduced to; or otherwise applied to the
human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting
attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and an article intended for use as a
component of that type of article. “Personal care product” does not include a
prescription drug, as that term is defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321.
(7) “Plastic microbead” means an intentionally added solid plastic
particle measuring five millimeters or less in every dimension.
(8) “Polish or floor maintenance product” means a chemically
formulated consumer product, such as polish, wax, or a restorer, labeled to
indicate that the purpose of the product is to polish, protect, buff, condition,
temporarily seal, or maintain furniture, floors, metal, leather, or other surfaces.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2029, no person shall sell, offer for sale,
distribute, or offer for promotional purposes in this State:
(1) a personal care product containing plastic microbeads that are used
as an abrasive to clean, exfoliate, or polish, in a rinse-off or non-rinse-off
product, including toothpaste and sunscreen; or
(2) a designated cleaning product containing plastic microbeads that are
used as an abrasive to clean, exfoliate, or polish.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385740 v.1